California statutes. Labor Code
 and who has worked for the incumbent grocery employer for at least six months prior to the execution of the transfer document. “Eligible grocery worker” does not include a managerial, supervisory, or confidential employee. 

(c) “Employment commencement date” means the date on which an eligible grocery worker retained by the successor grocery employer pursuant to this part commences work for the successor grocery employer in exchange for benefits and compensation under the terms and conditions established by the successor grocery employer and as required by law.

(d) “Grocery establishment” means a retail store in this state that is over 15,000 square feet in size and that sells primarily household foodstuffs for offsite consumption, including the sale of fresh produce, meats, poultry, fish, deli products, dairy products, canned foods, dry foods, beverages, baked foods, or prepared
 foods. Other household supplies or other products shall be secondary to the primary purpose of food sales. A distribution center owned and operated by a grocery establishment and used primarily to distribute goods to or from its owned stores shall be considered a grocery establishment, regardless of its square footage. A grocery establishment does not include a retail store that has ceased operations for 12 months or more.

(e) “Incumbent grocery employer” means the person that owns, controls, or operates the grocery establishment at the time of the change in control.

(f) “Job classification” means a system for categorizing certain duties into certain jobs.

(g) “Person” means an individual, corporation, partnership, limited partnership, limited liability partnership, limited liability company, business trust, estate,
 trust, association, joint venture, agency, instrumentality, or any other legal or commercial entity, whether domestic or foreign.

(h) “Successor grocery employer” means the person that owns, controls, or operates the grocery establishment after the change in control. A successor grocery employer may be the same entity as an incumbent employer when a change in control occurs but the covered employer remains the same.

(i) “Transfer document” means the purchase agreement or other document effecting the change in control.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 452, Sec. 1.   (AB 647)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

2504.

(a) (1) The incumbent grocery employer shall, within 15 days after the execution of the transfer document, provide to the successor grocery employer and any collective bargaining representative the name, address, date of hire, employment occupation classification, and, if known, the cellular telephone number and email address of each eligible grocery worker.

(2) If the incumbent grocery employer does not provide the information specified in paragraph (1) within 15 days, the successor grocery employer may obtain the information from a collective bargaining representative.

(b) The successor grocery employer shall maintain a preferential hiring list of eligible grocery workers
 identified by the incumbent grocery employer or collective bargaining representative pursuant to subdivision (a) and shall hire from that list for a period beginning upon the execution of the transfer document and continuing for 90 days after the grocery establishment is fully operational and open to the public under the successor grocery employer.

(c) If the successor grocery employer extends an offer of employment to an eligible grocery worker pursuant to this part, the successor grocery employer shall retain written verification of that offer for at least three years after the date of the offer. The verification shall include the name, address, date of hire, and employment occupation classification of each eligible grocery worker.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 452, Sec. 2.   (AB 647)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

2506.

(a) A successor grocery employer shall retain each eligible grocery worker hired pursuant to this part for at least 90 days after the eligible grocery worker’s employment commencement date. During this 90-day transition employment period, eligible grocery workers shall be employed under the terms and conditions established by the successor grocery employer and pursuant to the terms of a relevant collective bargaining agreement, if any.

(b) If, within the period established in subdivision (b) of Section 2504, the successor grocery employer determines that it requires fewer eligible grocery workers than were required by the incumbent grocery employer, the successor grocery employer shall retain eligible grocery workers by
 seniority within each job classification to the extent that comparable job classifications exist or pursuant to the terms of a relevant collective bargaining agreement, if any. Nonclassified eligible grocery workers shall be retained by seniority and according to experience or pursuant to the terms of a relevant collective bargaining agreement, if any.

(c) During the 90-day transition employment period, the successor grocery employer shall not discharge without cause an eligible grocery worker retained pursuant to this part.

(d) At the end of the 90-day transition employment period, the successor grocery employer shall make a written performance evaluation for each eligible grocery worker retained pursuant to this part. If the eligible grocery worker’s performance during the 90-day transition employment period is satisfactory, the
 successor grocery employer shall consider offering the eligible grocery worker continued employment under the terms and conditions established by the successor grocery employer and as required by law. The successor grocery employer shall retain a record of the written performance evaluation for at least three years.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 212, Sec. 1.   (AB 359)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

2508.

(a) The incumbent grocery employer shall post public notice of the change in control at the location of the affected grocery establishment within five business days following the execution of the transfer document. Notice shall remain posted during any closure of the grocery establishment and until the grocery establishment is fully operational and open to the public under the successor grocery employer.

(b) Notice shall include, but not be limited to, the name of the incumbent grocery employer and its contact information, the name of the successor grocery employer and its contact information, and the effective date of the change in control.

(c) Notice shall be posted in a conspicuous place at the grocery establishment in a manner to be readily viewed by eligible grocery workers and other employees, customers, and members of the public.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 212, Sec. 1.   (AB 359)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

2509.

An employer shall not refuse to employ, terminate, reduce the compensation of, or otherwise take adverse action against any employee for seeking to enforce their rights under this part, including participating in proceedings, opposing any practice prescribed by this part, or otherwise asserting rights under this part. This section applies to an employee who mistakenly, but in good faith, alleges noncompliance with this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 452, Sec. 3.   (AB 647)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

2510.

(a) An aggrieved employee or an employee representative, such as a collective bargaining representative or nonprofit corporation, may bring an action in the superior court of the State of California for violations of this part and may be awarded the following:

(1) Hiring and reinstatement rights pursuant to this part. For violations of the retention provision, the 90-day transition employment period shall not commence until the eligible grocery worker’s employment commencement date with the successor grocery employer.

(2) Front pay or back pay for each day during which the violation continues.

(3) The value of the
 benefits the employee would have received under any benefit plans.

(4) Punitive damages pursuant to Section 3294 of the Civil Code.

(5) The court may award reasonable attorney’s fees and costs to any employee or employee representative who prevails in an enforcement action.

(b) Before an employee or an employee representative brings an action in the superior court of the State of California for a violation of this part, both of the following requirements shall be met:

(1) The employee has provided written notice to the employer of the provisions of this part alleged to have been violated and the facts to support the alleged violation.

(2) The employer has not cured the alleged violation
 within 33 days from receipt of the written notice.

(c) The Labor Commissioner may enforce this section, including investigating an alleged violation and ordering appropriate temporary relief to mitigate the violation pending the completion of an investigation or hearing, through the procedures set forth in Section 98.3, 98.7, 98.74, or 1197.1, including by issuing a citation against an employer who violates this section or by filing a civil action.

(d) The Labor Commissioner may recover the following remedies on behalf of an aggrieved employee:

(1) Hiring and reinstatement rights pursuant to this chapter. For violations of the retention provision, the 90-day transition employment period shall not commence until the eligible grocery worker’s employment commencement date with the successor grocery employer.

(2) Front pay or back pay for each day during which the violation continues.

(3) The value of the benefits the employee would have received under any benefit plans.

(e) An employer, agent of an employer, or other person who violates this part or causes a violation of this part may be subject to a civil penalty of one hundred dollars ($100) for each employee whose rights under these provisions are violated. An additional amount payable as liquidated damages in the amount of one hundred dollars ($100) per employee, for each day the rights of an employee under this part are violated and continuing until the violation is cured, not to exceed one thousand dollars ($1,000) per employee, which may be recovered by the Labor Commissioner, deposited into the Labor and Workforce Development Fund, and paid to the employee as
 compensatory damages.

(f) Citation procedures for issuing, contesting, and enforcing judgments for citations and civil penalties issued by the Labor Commissioner shall be the same as those set out in Section 98.74 or 1197.1, as appropriate.

(g) In an action brought by the Labor Commissioner for enforcement of this section, the court may issue preliminary and permanent injunctive relief to vindicate the rights of employees. In a civil action, the Labor Commissioner may also recover all remedies set forth in subdivision (d).

(h) In an administrative or civil action brought under this section, the Labor Commissioner or court shall award interest on all amounts due and unpaid at the rate of interest specified in subdivision (b) of Section 3289 of the Civil Code.

(i) The remedies, penalties, and procedures provided under this section are cumulative.

(j) The Labor Commissioner may promulgate and enforce rules and regulations and issue determinations and interpretations consistent with and necessary for the implementation of this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 452, Sec. 4.   (AB 647)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

2512.

Parties subject to this part may, by collective bargaining agreement, provide that the agreement supersedes the requirements of this part, in whole or in part, but only if the agreement explicitly sets forth in clear and unambiguous terms the requirements of this part that are superseded.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 452, Sec. 5.   (AB 647)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

2516.

This part shall not apply to grocery establishments that will be located in geographic areas designated by the United States Department of Agriculture as a food desert, based on the original food desert measure contained in the Food Access Research Atlas, provided that both of the following apply:

(a) More than six years have elapsed since the most recent grocery establishment was located in the area designated as a food desert.

(b) The grocery establishment stocks and during normal business hours sells fresh fruit and vegetables in amounts and of a quality that is comparable to what the establishment sells in its three geographically closest stores, which are located outside of the food
 desert.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 212, Sec. 1.   (AB 359)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

2517.

(a) This part shall not apply to an incumbent grocery employer and the successor grocery employer executing the transfer document with that incumbent grocery employer, if the sum of both of the following is less than 300:

(1) The number of grocery workers employed, immediately prior to the change in control, by the incumbent grocery employer across that employer’s grocery establishments nationwide.

(2) The number of grocery workers employed, immediately prior to the change in control, by the successor grocery employer across that employer’s grocery establishments nationwide.

(b) Notwithstanding any law, and for purposes
 of this section only, the following definitions apply:

(1) “Grocery establishment” as used in this section has the same meaning as defined in Section 2502, but shall also include grocery establishments in other states in the United States.

(2) “Grocery worker” as used in this section means any individual whose primary place of employment is at a grocery establishment that is owned, controlled, or operated by the incumbent or successor grocery employer, as applicable.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 452, Sec. 6.   (AB 647)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

2518.

This part shall not be construed to limit an eligible grocery worker’s right to bring legal action for wrongful termination.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 212, Sec. 1.   (AB 359)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

2520.

This part does not preempt any city, county, or city and county ordinances that provide equal or greater protection to eligible grocery workers.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 212, Sec. 1.   (AB 359)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

2522.

The provisions of this part are severable. If any provision of this part or its application is held invalid, that invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications that can be given effect without the invalid provision or application.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 212, Sec. 1.   (AB 359)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 10. INDUSTRIAL HOMEWORK [2650. - 2667.]

2650.

As used in this part:

(a) “To manufacture” means to make, process, prepare, alter, repair, or finish in whole or in part, or to assemble, inspect, wrap, or package any articles or materials.

(b) “Employer” means any person who, directly or indirectly or through an employee, agent, independent contractor, or any other person, employs an industrial homeworker.

(c) “Home” means any room, house, apartment, or other premises, whichever is most extensive, used in whole or in part as a place of dwelling; and includes outbuildings upon premises that are primarily used as a place of dwelling, where such outbuildings are under the control of the person dwelling on such premises.

(d) “Industrial homework” means any manufacture in a home of materials or articles for an employer when such articles or materials are not for the personal use of the employer or a member of his or her family.

(e) “Division” means the Division of Labor Standards Enforcement.

(f) “Industrial homeworker” means any person who does industrial homework. 

(g) “To employ” means to engage, suffer or permit any person to do industrial homework, or to tolerate, suffer, or permit articles or materials under one’s custody or control to be manufactured in a home by industrial homework.

(h) “Person” means any individual, partnership and each partner thereof, corporation, limited liability company, or association.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1010, Sec. 185.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

2651.

The manufacture by industrial homework of any of the following materials or articles shall be unlawful, and no license or permit issued under this part shall be deemed to authorize such manufacture: articles of food or drink; articles for use in connection with the serving of food or drink; articles of wearing apparel; toys and dolls; tobacco; drugs and poisons; bandages and other sanitary goods; explosives, fireworks, and articles of like character; articles, the manufacture of which by industrial homework is determined by the division to be injurious to the health or welfare of the industrial homeworkers within the industry or to render unduly difficult the maintenance of existing labor standards or the enforcement of labor standards established by law or regulation for factory workers in the industry.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1975, Ch. 735.)
-------------------------------------------

2652.

The division shall have the power to make an investigation of any industry not specifically exempted and made unlawful by Section 2651 which employs industrial homeworkers, in order to determine whether the wages and conditions of employment of industrial homeworkers in the industry are injurious to their health and welfare or whether the wages and conditions of employment of the industrial homeworkers have the effect of rendering unduly difficult the maintenance of existing labor standards or the enforcement of labor standards established by law or regulation for factory workers in the industry.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1975, Ch. 735.)
-------------------------------------------

2653.

To effectuate the provisions of this part, the division shall have the powers given by Article 2 (commencing with Section 11180) of Chapter 2, Part 1, Division 3, Title 2 of the Government Code to a head of a department.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 420.)
-------------------------------------------

2654.

If, on the basis of information in its possession, with or without an investigation, the division shall find that industrial homework cannot be continued within an industry without injuring the health and welfare of the industrial homeworkers within that industry, or without rendering unduly difficult the maintenance of existing labor standards or the enforcement of labor standards established by law or regulation for factory workers in that industry, the division shall by order declare such industrial homework to be unlawful and require all employers in the industry to discontinue manufacture by industrial homework. The order shall set forth the type or types of manufacturing which are prohibited after its effective date, and shall contain such terms and conditions as the division may deem necessary to carry out the purpose and intent of this part.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1975, Ch. 735.)
-------------------------------------------

2655.

After making such order the division shall hold a public hearing or hearings at which an opportunity to be heard shall be afforded to any employer, or representative of employers, and any industrial homeworker, or representative of industrial homeworkers, and any other person having an interest in the subject matter of the hearing. A public notice of each hearing shall be given at least 30 days before the hearing is held and in such manner as may be determined by the division. The division shall send written notice of the hearing to every business and employer which the division believes may be adversely affected by the order. The hearing or hearings shall be in such place or places as the division deems most convenient to the employers and industrial homeworkers to be affected by the order.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1975, Ch. 735.)
-------------------------------------------

2656.

The division may seek a search warrant pursuant to the procedures set forth in Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 1523) of Title 12 of Part 2 of the Penal Code to enable it to have access to, and to inspect, the premises of any industrial homeworker or distributor in this state.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 735.)
-------------------------------------------

2658.

(a) A person shall not employ an industrial homeworker in any industry not prohibited by Section 2651 unless the person employing an industrial homeworker has obtained a valid industrial homework license from the division.

(b) Application for a license to employ industrial homeworkers shall be made to the division in a form as the division may by regulation prescribe. A license fee of one hundred dollars ($100) for each industrial homeworker employed shall be paid to the division and the license shall be valid for a period of one year from the date of issuance unless sooner revoked or suspended.

(c) Renewal fees shall be
 at the same rate and conditions as the original license.

(d) The division may revoke or suspend the license upon a finding that the person has violated this part or has failed to comply with the regulations of the division or with the license. The industrial homework license shall not be transferable.

(e) All license and permit fees received under this part shall be paid into the Labor Enforcement and Compliance Fund.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 31, Sec. 187.   (SB 836)   Effective June 27, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

2658.1.

Every person who, without having in his possession a then valid industrial homework license issued to him by the Division of Labor Standards Enforcement, negligently fails to prevent articles or materials under his custody or control from being taken to a home for manufacture by industrial homework is guilty of a misdemeanor. Possession, control or custody of articles or materials for the purpose of manufacture by industrial homework by a person other than the owner or operator of a factory shall be presumptive evidence that said owner or operator has negligently failed to prevent articles or materials under his custody or control from being taken to a home for manufacture by industrial homework, where it is established that such owner or operator is entitled to possession, control or custody of such articles.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 676.)
-------------------------------------------

2658.5.

Every person, which term shall be deemed to include manufacturers, contractors, jobbers and wholesalers, who, without having in his possession a then-valid industrial homework license issued to him by the Division of Labor Standards Enforcement, employs an industrial homeworker, or who tolerates, suffers, or permits articles or materials owned by him, or under his custody or control to be taken to a home for manufacture by industrial homework or who accepts and pays a person for the manufacture in a home of articles and materials by industrial homework, or who places an advertisement for industrial homework the performance of which is not permitted under this part is guilty of a misdemeanor which misdemeanor shall be punished for the first offense by a fine of not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000) or by imprisonment in the county jail for not more than 30 days, or by both such fine and imprisonment, and for a second conviction by a fine of not more than five thousand dollars ($5,000) or imprisonment in the county jail for not more than six months, or by both such fine and imprisonment. A person, which term shall be deemed to include manufacturers, contractors, jobbers and wholesalers, convicted for a third time, and any subsequent times, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor, and shall be punished by a fine of not more than thirty thousand dollars ($30,000) or by imprisonment in the county jail for not more than one year, or by both such fine and imprisonment. Upon a third conviction, in addition to any penalties or fines imposed, the business license of the manufacturer or owner of the goods, garments or products produced by industrial homework which is not permitted by this part shall be suspended for a period not to exceed three years. The court may suspend all or a part of any penalty imposed by this section on condition that the defendant refrains from any future or other violation of this part.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 676.)
-------------------------------------------

2658.7.

Any goods, assembled or partially assembled, whether found in the homeworker’s home, in transit to or from the home, or in the manufacturer’s or his contractor’s possession, pursuant to an order obtained under Section 2656, which constitute evidence of a violation of industrial homework laws, shall be confiscated by the division and properly marked and identified.

A determination or decision that a violation of Section 2651 has been committed shall carry with it, in addition to whatever other penalties are imposed as prescribed in this act, forfeiture of the aforementioned confiscated goods, garments or products identified as goods, garments or products produced by illegal industrial homework, and placed in the custody of the division, which shall be charged with the responsibility of disposing of them.

The division shall have the power to make an investigation of any industry in which the utilization of industrial homework has been made unlawful by Section 2651, in order to determine compliance with Section 2651.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 612.)
-------------------------------------------

2659.

No person shall engage, suffer or permit any person to do industrial homework, or tolerate, suffer or permit articles or materials under his custody or control to be manufactured by industrial homework by a person who is not in possession of either a valid employer’s license or homeworker’s permit issued in accordance with this part.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 420.)
-------------------------------------------

2660.

No person shall do industrial homework within this state unless he has in his possession a valid homeworker’s permit issued to him by the division. The permit shall be issued for a fee of twenty-five dollars ($25), and shall be valid for industrial homework performed for the licensed employer of industrial homeworkers, named therein, for a period of one year from the date of its issuance unless sooner revoked or suspended. Application for a permit shall be made in such form as the division may by regulation prescribe. The permit shall be valid only for work performed by the applicant himself in his own home. The division may waive the fee for a homeworker’s permit in cases where the applicant requests such waiver, and can establish that payments of the fee would result in financial hardship.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1975, Ch. 735.)
-------------------------------------------

2660.1.

Every person doing industrial homework, with or without a valid homeworker’s permit issued by the division, shall reveal to the division, on demand, the name and address of the employer, the name and address of the owner or source of the articles or materials for industrial homework, the rate of compensation and any other information known to the homeworker and pertinent to the enforcement of this section. This information so revealed by the homeworker to the division shall not be used by the division in any action against or prosecution of the homeworker.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 420.)
-------------------------------------------

2660.5.

Every person who does industrial homework without having in his possession a valid homeworker’s permit issued to him by the division is guilty of a misdemeanor which misdemeanor shall be punishable for the first offense by a fine of not more than fifty dollars ($50) and for the second offense by a fine of not more than one hundred dollars ($100). The court may suspend such fine on condition the industrial homeworker cooperates with the division in the lawful prosecutions of persons violating this part and to secure compliance with this part, or on condition the defendant refrains from any future violation of this part.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1975, Ch. 735.)
-------------------------------------------

2661.

No homeworker’s permit shall be issued to any person under the age of 16 years; or to any person suffering from an infectious, contagious, or communicable disease, or to any person living in a home that is not clean, sanitary, and free from infectious, contagious, or communicable disease.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1975, Ch. 735.)
-------------------------------------------

2662.

The division may revoke or suspend any homeworker’s permit upon a finding that the industrial homeworker is performing industrial homework contrary to the conditions under which the permit was issued or in violation of this part or has permitted any person not holding a valid homeworker’s permit to assist him in performing industrial homework or on expiration or revocation of the industrial homework license of the employer.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 420.)
-------------------------------------------

2663.

No person shall tolerate, suffer or permit any materials or articles to be manufactured by industrial homework unless there has been conspicuously affixed to each article or material or, if this is impossible, to the package or other container in which such goods are kept, a label or other mark of identification bearing the employer’s name and address, printed or written legibly in English.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 420.)
-------------------------------------------

2664.

(a) Any article or material which is being manufactured in a home in violation of any provision of this part may be confiscated by the division. Articles or material confiscated pursuant to this section shall be placed in the custody of the division, which shall be responsible for destroying or disposing of them pursuant to regulations adopted under Section 2666, provided that the articles or material shall not enter the mainstream of commerce and shall not be offered for sale. The division shall, by certified mail, give notice of the confiscation and the procedure for appealing the confiscation to the person whose name and address are affixed to the article or material as provided in this part. The notice shall state that failure to file a written notice of appeal with the Labor Commissioner within 15 days after service of the notice of confiscation shall result in the destruction or disposition of the confiscated article or material.

(b) To contest the confiscation of articles or material, a person shall, within 15 days after service of the notice of confiscation, file a written notice of appeal with the Office of the Labor Commissioner at the address that appears on the notice of confiscation. Within 30 days after the timely filing of a notice of appeal, the Labor Commissioner shall hold a hearing on the appeal. The hearing shall be recorded. Based on the evidence presented at the hearing, the Labor Commissioner may affirm, modify, or dismiss the confiscation, and may order the return of none, some, or all of the confiscated articles or material, under terms that the Labor Commissioner may specify. The decision of the Labor Commissioner shall consist of findings of fact, legal analysis, and an order. The decision shall be served by first-class mail on all parties to the hearing, to the last known address of the parties on file with the Labor Commissioner, within 15 days of the conclusion of the hearing. Service shall be complete pursuant to Section 1013 of the Code of Civil Procedure. Judicial review shall be by petition for writ of mandate, filed with the appropriate court, within 45 days of service of the decision.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 214, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

2665.

Every person who employs or otherwise avails himself of the services of industrial homeworkers in this State shall:

(a) Comply with the labor standards as provided in Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 1171) of Part 4 of Division 2 of the Labor Code.

(b) Keep in a manner approved by the division, accurate information as follows:

1. Full name and home address of each industrial homeworker employed by him; 

2. Amount and description of materials delivered to each industrial homeworker employed by him with date of delivery, and rate of compensation;

3. Gross amount of compensation paid to each industrial homeworker employed by him and date of payment;

4. Names and addresses of all agents or independent contractors to whom he has delivered materials or articles for manufacture by industrial homework together with quantity, description of materials and date of delivery;

5. Names and addresses of all manufacturers or independent contractors from whom he has received articles or materials for industrial homework together with quantity, description of materials and date of receipt.

(c) Furnish to the division at its request reports or information which the division requires to carry out the provisions of this part. Such reports and information shall be verified as requested by the division.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 420.)
-------------------------------------------

2666.

The Division of Labor Standards Enforcement shall enforce the provisions of this part. The division and the authorized representatives of the Department of Industrial Relations are authorized and directed to make all inspections and investigations necessary for the enforcement of this part. Every employer shall permit authorized employees of the division free access to his place of business for the purpose of making investigations authorized by this part or necessary to carry out its provisions and permit them to inspect and copy his payroll or other records or documents relating to the enforcement of this part, or interview his employees or agents. The division may make, in accordance with the provisions of Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, such rules and regulations as are reasonably necessary to carry out the provisions of this part. The violation of any such rule or regulation shall be deemed a violation of this part.

Every law enforcement officer of the state, any county, municipality, or other government entity who has reason to suspect any violation of this part shall have all the powers of an authorized representative of the Department of Industrial Relations, in the investigation of such suspected violation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 676.)
-------------------------------------------

2667.

Unless otherwise provided herein, every person acting either individually or as an officer, agent, employee or independent contractor for another person who violates or refuses or neglects to comply with any provision of this part, or any regulation of the division made in accordance with the provisions of this part is guilty of a misdemeanor.

Whenever the provisions of this part prohibit the employment of a person in certain work or under certain conditions, the employer shall not knowingly permit such person to work with or without compensation.

The Attorney General may seek appropriate injunctive relief consistent with, and in furtherance of the purposes of, this part.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1975, Ch. 735.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 11. GARMENT MANUFACTURING [2670. - 2693.1.]



  CHAPTER 1. General Provisions [2670. - 2674.2.]

2670.

(a) It is the intent of the Legislature to restore the purpose of Assembly Bill 633 (Chapter 554 of the Statutes of 1999) to prevent wage theft against garment workers by clarifying ambiguities in the original language. Assembly Bill 633 sought to ensure that persons who contracted to have garments manufactured were liable as guarantors for the unpaid wages and overtime of the workers making their garments.

Several manufacturers, however, have attempted to avoid liability as a guarantor by adding layers of contracting between themselves and the employees manufacturing the garments. This undermines the purpose of Assembly Bill 633 because manufacturers have no incentive to ensure safe conditions or the proper minimum wage and overtime payments for
 the workers producing their garments if they do not face guarantor liability.

This act, therefore, revises this part to make clear that a person contracting to have garments made is liable for the full amount of unpaid minimum, regular, overtime, and other premium wages, as well as reimbursement for expenses owed to the workers who manufacture those garments regardless of how many layers of contracting that person may use.

 Assembly Bill 633 was also designed to ensure that underpaid, and unpaid, garment workers would be able to recoup their stolen wages, even when factories shut down, declared bankruptcy, or otherwise shirked their obligations to lawfully pay their workers. In order to make sure that these workers were made whole, Assembly Bill 633 required that a portion of garment manufacturers’ annual registration or renewal fees be deposited into a fund. However, in the last 20 years, registration and renewal fees have
 remained frozen in place, while minimum wage and worker claims have risen steadily, meaning the revenues flowing into the fund have not kept up with the demands on the fund. As a result, workers who have already proven that they are owed stolen wages are on a waiting list, waiting anywhere from 5 to 20 years, to be paid. While the Legislature recently passed a budget with a one-time appropriation of funds temporarily eliminating the waiting list, structural change is necessary in order to permanently eliminate the hardship placed on garment workers who are unable to recoup their stolen wages within a reasonable amount of time.

(b) By restoring the original intent of this part, the Legislature will be able to more effectively establish and regulate a system of registration, penalties, confiscation, bonding requirements, and misdemeanors for the imposition of prompt and effective criminal and civil sanctions against violations of, and especially
 patterns and practices of violations of, any of the laws as set forth herein and regulations of this state applicable to the employment of workers in the garment industry. The civil penalties provided for in this part are in addition to any other penalty provided by law. This part shall be deemed an exercise of the police power of the state for the protection of the public welfare, prosperity, health, safety, and peace of the people of the State of California. Nothing herein shall prohibit a local municipality from enacting its own protections for workers employed in the garment industry, so long as those protections are equal to, or in addition to, the protections provided herein.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 329, Sec. 3.   (SB 62)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

2671.

As used in this part:
